Nebraska, session 109, LB246.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 81-2,239, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-2,239 Sections 81-2,239 to 81-2,292 and section 3 of this act and the
provisions of the Food Code and the Current Good Manufacturing Practice In
Manufacturing, Packing, or Holding Human Food adopted by reference in sections
81-2,257.01 and 81-2,259, shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Pure
Food Act.
Sec. 2. Section 81-2,240, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-2,240 For purposes of the Nebraska Pure Food Act, unless the context
otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 81-2,241 to 81-2,254 and
section 3 of this act shall be used. In addition, the definitions found in the
code and practice adopted by reference in sections 81-2,257.01 and 81-2,259
shall be used.
Sec. 3. Cultivated-protein food product means a food product having one
or more sensory attributes that resemble a type of tissue originating from an
agricultural food animal but that, in lieu of being derived from meat
processing, is derived from manufacturing cells, including processes in which
one or more stem cells that were initially isolated from an agricultural food
animal, are grown in vitro, and may be manipulated, as part of a manufacturing
operation.
Sec. 4. Section 81-2,282, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-2,282 (1) No person shall It shall be unlawful for any person to
adulterate any food or for any person to manufacture, produce, import,
distribute, promote, display for sale, offer for sale, attempt to sell, or sell
any adulterated food.
(2) Food shall be deemed to be adulterated if:
(a) It bears or contains any substance which may render it injurious to
health, considering the quantity of such substance in or on the food;
(b) It consists in whole or in part of any diseased, contaminated, filthy,
putrid, or decomposed substance or is otherwise unsafe for use as food;
(c) It has been manufactured, processed, packaged, stored, or held under
insanitary conditions where it may have become unsafe for use as food;
(d) It is the product of a diseased animal or one that has died by any
means other than slaughter;
(e) It is a cultivated-protein food product;
(f) (e) Its container is so constructed as to render the food unsafe or
otherwise injurious to health; or
(g) (f) Any valuable constituent of the food has been wholly or partially
omitted or abstracted.
(3)(a) Any violation of this section that is committed in the course of
business, vocation, or occupation shall, additionally and separately,
constitute a deceptive trade practice.
(b) This section shall not be construed to affect the liability for any
action that violates the Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act.
Sec. 5. Section 87-302, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
87-302 (a) A person engages in a deceptive trade practice when, in the
course of his or her business, vocation, or occupation, he or she:
(1) Passes off goods or services as those of another;
(2) Causes likelihood of confusion or of misunderstanding as to the
source, sponsorship, approval, or certification of goods or services;
(3) Causes likelihood of confusion or of misunderstanding as to
affiliation, connection, or association with, or certification by, another;
(4) Uses deceptive representations or designations of geographic origin in
connection with goods or services;
(5) Represents that goods or services have sponsorship, approval,
characteristics, ingredients, uses, benefits, or quantities that they do not
have or that a person has a sponsorship, approval, status, affiliation, or
connection that he or she does not have;
(6) Represents that goods or services do not have sponsorship, approval,
characteristics, ingredients, uses, benefits, or quantities that they have or
-1-

LB246 LB246
2025 2025
that a person does not have a sponsorship, approval, status, affiliation, or
connection that he or she has;
(7) Represents that goods are original or new if they are deteriorated,
altered, reconditioned, reclaimed, used, or secondhand, except that sellers may
repair damage to and make adjustments on or replace parts of otherwise new
goods in an effort to place such goods in compliance with factory
specifications;
(8) Represents that goods or services are of a particular standard,
quality, or grade, or that goods are of a particular style or model, if they
are of another;
(9) Disparages the goods, services, or business of another by false or
misleading representation of fact;
(10) Advertises goods or services with intent not to sell them as
advertised or advertises the price in any manner calculated or tending to
mislead or in any way deceive a person;
(11) Advertises goods or services with intent not to supply reasonably
expectable public demand, unless the advertisement discloses a limitation of
quantity;
(12) Makes false or misleading statements of fact concerning the reasons
for, existence of, or amounts of price reductions;
(13) Uses or promotes the use of or establishes, operates, or participates
in a pyramid promotional scheme in connection with the solicitation of such
scheme to members of the public. This subdivision shall not be construed to
prohibit a plan or operation, or to define a plan or operation as a pyramid
promotional scheme, based on the fact that participants in the plan or
operation give consideration in return for the right to receive compensation
based upon purchases of goods, services, or intangible property by participants
for personal use, consumption, or resale so long as the plan or operation does
not promote or induce inventory loading and the plan or operation implements an
appropriate inventory repurchase program;
(14) With respect to a sale or lease to a natural person of goods or
services purchased or leased primarily for personal, family, household, or
agricultural purposes, uses or employs any referral or chain referral sales
technique, plan, arrangement, or agreement;
(15) Knowingly makes a false or misleading statement in a privacy policy,
published on the Internet or otherwise distributed or published, regarding the
use of personal information submitted by members of the public;
(16) Uses any scheme or device to defraud by means of:
(i) Obtaining money or property by knowingly false or fraudulent
pretenses, representations, or promises; or
(ii) Selling, distributing, supplying, furnishing, or procuring any
property for the purpose of furthering such scheme;
(17) Offers an unsolicited check, through the mail or by other means, to
promote goods or services if the cashing or depositing of the check obligates
the endorser or payee identified on the check to pay for goods or services.
This subdivision does not apply to an extension of credit or an offer to lend
money;
(18) Mails or causes to be sent an unsolicited billing statement, invoice,
or other document that appears to obligate the consumer to make a payment for
services or merchandise he or she did not order;
(19)(i) Installs, offers to install, or makes available for installation
or download a covered file-sharing program on a computer not owned by such
person without providing clear and conspicuous notice to the owner or
authorized user of the computer that files on that computer will be made
available to the public and without requiring intentional and affirmative
activation of the file-sharing function of such covered file-sharing program by
the owner or authorized user of the computer; or
(ii) Prevents reasonable efforts to block the installation, execution, or
disabling of a covered file-sharing program;
(20) Violates any provision of the Nebraska Foreclosure Protection Act;
(21) In connection with the solicitation of funds or other assets for any
charitable purpose, or in connection with any solicitation which represents
that funds or assets will be used for any charitable purpose, uses or employs
any deception, fraud, false pretense, false promise, misrepresentation, unfair
practice, or concealment, suppression, or omission of any material fact;
(22)(i) In the manufacture, production, importation, distribution,
promotion, display for sale, offer for sale, attempt to sell, or sale of a
substance:
(A) Makes a deceptive or misleading representation or designation, or
omits material information, about a substance or fails to identify the contents
of the package or the nature of the substance contained inside the package; or
(B) Causes confusion or misunderstanding as to the effects a substance
causes when ingested, injected, inhaled, or otherwise introduced into the human
body.
(ii) A person shall be deemed to have committed a violation of the Uniform
Deceptive Trade Practices Act for each individually packaged product that is
either manufactured, produced, imported, distributed, promoted, displayed for
sale, offered for sale, attempted to sell, or sold in violation of this
section. A violation under this subdivision (a)(22) shall be treated as a
separate and distinct violation from any other offense arising out of acts
alleged to have been committed while the person was in violation of this
section;
(23)(i) Manufactures, produces, publishes, distributes, monetizes,
-2-

LB246 LB246
2025 2025
promotes, or otherwise makes publicly available any visual depiction of
sexually explicit conduct, any obscene material, or any material that is
harmful to minors in which any person depicted as a participant or observer:
(A) Is under eighteen years of age;
(B) Is a trafficking victim;
(C) Has not expressly and voluntarily consented to such person's
depiction; or
(D) Participated in any act depicted without consent.
(ii) This subdivision (a)(23) does not apply to any telecommunications
service.
(iii) For purposes of this subdivision (a)(23):
(A) Harmful to minors has the same meaning as in 47 U.S.C. 254, as such
section existed on January 1, 2024;
(B) Obscene material has the same meaning as in section 28-807;
(C) Promote means to use any mechanism or publication, or take any action,
that suggests, highlights, advertises, markets, curates, backlinks, hashtags,
or otherwise directs, attempts to direct, or encourages traffic toward specific
materials, including acts carried out affirmatively, through automation,
algorithmically, and via other technical means both known and unknown at this
time;
(D) Publish means to communicate or make information available to another
person via an Internet website, regardless of whether the person consuming,
viewing, or receiving the material gives any consideration for the published
material;
(E) Trafficking victim has the same meaning as in section 28-830;
(F) Visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct has the same meaning as
in section 28-1463.02; and
(G) Without consent has the same meaning as in section 28-318; or
(24) Offers or enters into a right-to-list home sale agreement as defined
in section 81-885.01; or .
(25) Violates section 81-2,282.
(b) In order to prevail in an action under the Uniform Deceptive Trade
Practices Act, a complainant need not prove competition between the parties.
(c) This section does not affect unfair trade practices otherwise
actionable at common law or under other statutes of this state.
Sec. 6. Original sections 81-2,239, 81-2,240, 81-2,282, and 87-302,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-3-